Massachusetts, session 194th, H4817.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws , the 
licensing authority of the town of Pembroke may grant 1 additional license for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to  
South Shore Market and Deli, located at 256 Church Street in the town. A license granted 
pursuant to this act shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17. 
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license granted pursuant 
to this act to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same 
location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue 
and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in 
good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have 
been paid. 
(c) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this act or any such 
license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of the 

of 2 14 legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority, which may, 
within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant at the same location, 
otherwise such license shall dissolve. 
(d) The license granted pursuant to this act shall be issued within 3 years after the 
effective date of this act; provided, however, that is the license is originally granted within that 
time period, it may be granted to a new applicant under subsections (b) and (c) thereafter.  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.